Hawaii statutes.
[§514A-13.6] Mailboxes for each dwelling
required. Any:

(1) Condominium:

(A) Built;

(B) Rehabilitated, reconstructed, or
otherwise improved to the extent that the value of the work required equals at
least one per cent of the appraised value of the building; or

(2) Existing building converted to condominium
status;

after May 18, 1984, shall provide at least one
mailbox for each dwelling unit. [L 1984, c 112, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"May 18, 1984" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next